Massachusetts, session 194th, H5007.
Be it enacted by the People, and by their authority, as follows:
1 SECTION 1. Section 4 of chapter 62 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2024
2 Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out subparagraph (a)(l)(2) and subparagraph (b)
3 and inserting in place thereof the following two subparagraphs —
4 (a) (l)(2) Part A taxable income consisting of interest and dividends shall be taxed at the
5 rate of 4.67 per cent for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2027, 4.33 per cent for the tax year
6 beginning on January 1, 2028, and 4.00 per cent for tax years beginning on or after January 1,
7 2029.
8 (b) Part B taxable income shall be taxed at the rate of 4.67 per cent for the tax year
9 beginning on January 1, 2027, 4.33 per cent for the tax year beginning on January 1, 2028, and
10 4.00 per cent for tax years beginning on or after January 1, 2029.
11 SECTION 2. The provisions of this law are severable, and if any clause, sentence,
12 paragraph or section of this chapter, or an application thereof, shall be adjudged by any court of
13 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the
2 of 6

14 remainder thereof but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph,
15 section, or application adjudged invalid.
3 of 6

FIRST TEN SIGNERS
NAME RESIDENCE CITY OR TOWN
James John Stergios 584 Washington Street Brookline
Christopher Robert 18 Lillian Way Wayland
Anderson
Christopher Richard 115 Lester Road Brockton
Carlozzi
Elizabeth Karoline 28 Mount Vernon Street Arlington
Mahoney
Paul D. Craney 80 Osgood Street North Andover
Pauline Ann Zywaski 62 Russett Road Boston
Ellen Claire Paxton 262 Riverbend Drive Groton
Kenneth Douglas Paxton 262 Riverbend Drive Groton
Stephen D. Fantone 340 Summer Street Lynnfield
Richard F. Laws 5 Elderberry Road Westford
4 of 6

CERTIFICATE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
September 3, 2025.
Honorable William Francis Galvin
Secretary of the Commonwealth
One Ashburton Place, Room 1705
Boston, Massachusetts 02108
Re: Initiative Petition No. 25-18: Initiative Petition for a Law Relative to
Reducing the State Personal Income Tax Rate from 5% to 4%
Dear Secretary Galvin:
In accordance with the provisions of Article 48 of the Amendments to
the Massachusetts Constitution, I have reviewed the above-referenced initiative
petition, which was submitted to me on or before the first Wednesday of August
of this year.
I hereby certify that this measure is in proper form for submission to
the people; that the measure is not, either affirmatively or negatively,
substantially the same as any measure which has been qualified for submission
or submitted to the people at either of the two preceding biennial state elections;
and that it contains only subjects that are related or are mutually dependent and
which are not excluded from the initiative process pursuant to Article 48, the
Initiative, Part 2, Section 2.
In accordance with Article 48, I enclose a fair, concise summary of the
measure.
Sincerely,
ANDREA JOY CAMPBELL,
Attorney General.
5 of 6

SUMMARY OF 25-18
This proposed law would, over a period of three years, lower the tax rates on (1) personal
taxable income consisting of interest and dividends, and (2) personal taxable income other than
interest, dividends or capital gain income, such as wages and salaries. Both tax rates were 5.00%
for tax year 2024. The proposed law would set both tax rates at 4.67% for tax year 2027, 4.33%
for tax year 2028, and 4.00% beginning in tax year 2029.
The proposed law states that, if any of its parts were declared invalid, the other parts
would stay in effect.
6 of 6